Mississippi, session 2026, SB2436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The department shall control, regulate and manage the taking of all black bears. (2)  The department shall create, set and regulate a black bear season, beginning with the 2027-2028 hunting season. (3)  Residents and nonresidents shall be required to purchase the following to hunt or kill any black bear for any purpose: (a)  A Mississippi hunting license for the year of the hunt; and (b)  A black bear harvest tag established in subsection (4) of this section. (4)  (a)  The department shall establish a black bear harvest tag to hunt or kill black bears. (i)  The number of black bear harvest tags authorized each year shall be based on the commission's black bear population data. (ii)  The department shall establish a lottery system for issuance of black bear harvest tags, and shall establish a reasonable fee for applications to be entered into the lottery.  To be eligible for a harvest tag, all applicants must purchase a Mississippi hunting license for the application year. (iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph (a), one (1) black bear harvest tag for each hunting season shall be reserved as the "Governor's Tag," and shall be assigned to the Governor for donation to the department or to the Mississippi Wildlife, Fisheries, Parks and Marine Foundation to be auctioned to raise money for restoring, enhancing or protecting black bear populations or their habitats in Mississippi, as prescribed by the department. The department shall be prohibited from donating any other harvest tag(s) or from designating any number of harvest tags for any nonprofit or for-profit entity. (b)  Beginning with the 2027-2028 hunting season, the department shall offer black bear harvest tags under paragraph (a) of this subsection to residents. (c)  Beginning with the 2032-2033 hunting season, the department may offer black bear harvest tags under paragraph (a) of this subsection to nonresidents.  No more than ten percent (10%) of the total number of harvest tags issued for any year shall be made available to nonresidents. (5)  Any person who violates this section shall be deemed guilty, upon conviction, of a Class I violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-141. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.